New Jersey, session 221, S594.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no payer shall use downcoding in a manner that prevents a health care provider from submitting a health benefits claim for the actual service performed and collecting reimbursement from the payer for that service. b.    The Department of Banking and Insurance shall adopt regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to effectuate the purposes of this act. c.     As used in this section: "Carrier" means an insurance company, health service corporation, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization authorized to issue health benefits plans in this State. "Covered person" means a person on whose behalf a carrier offering a health benefits plan is obligated to pay benefits or provide services pursuant to the health benefits plan. Downcoding means the adjustment of a health benefits claim submitted to a payer to a less complex or lower cost service in order to reimburse a provider in an amount less than is required pursuant to the provider contract.  Downcoding includes, but is not limited to, the use of remark codes. "Health benefits claim" means a claim by a covered person for payment of benefits under a health benefits plan. "Health benefits plan" means a hospital and medical expense insurance policy; health service corporation contract; hospital service corporation contract; medical service corporation contract; health maintenance organization subscriber contract; or other plan for medical care delivered or issued for delivery in this State. Payer" means a carrier or any agent thereof or an organized delivery system or any agent thereof that is doing business in the State and is under a contractual obligation to pay insured claims. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 180th day next following the date of enactment.